New York, session 2025-2026, S8545.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 2500-a of the public health law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (l) to read as follows: 3 (l) Gaucher disease. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13424-01-5